Utah statutes.
59-12-107.   Collection, remittance, and payment of tax by sellers or other
persons -- Returns -- Reports -- Direct payment by purchaser of vehicle --
Other liability for collection -- Rulemaking authority -- Credits -- Treatment
of bad debt -- Penalties.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(d) or Section 59-12-107.1 or
59-12-123 and subject to Subsection (1)(e), each seller shall pay or collect
and remit the sales and use taxes imposed by this chapter if within this state
the seller:
(i)  has or utilizes:
(A)  an office;
(B)  a distribution house;
(C)  a sales house;
(D)  a warehouse;
(E)  a service enterprise; or
(F)  a place of business similar to Subsections (1)(a)(i)(A) through (E);
(ii)  maintains a stock of goods;
(iii)  regularly solicits orders, regardless of whether or not the orders are
accepted in the state, unless the seller's only activity in the state is:
(A)  advertising; or
(B)  solicitation by:
(I)  direct mail;
(II)  electronic mail;
(III)  the Internet;
(IV)  telecommunications service; or
(V)  a means similar to Subsection (1)(a)(iii)(A) or (B);
(iv)  regularly engages in the delivery of property in the state other than
by:
(A)  common carrier; or
(B)  United States mail; or
(v)  regularly engages in an activity directly related to the leasing or
servicing of property located within the state.
(b)  A seller that does not meet one or more of the criteria provided for in
Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), may voluntarily:
(A)  collect a tax on a transaction described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); and
(B)  remit the tax to the commission as provided in this part; or
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b)(i), shall collect a tax on a
transaction described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) if Section 59-12-103.1
requires the seller to collect the tax.
(c)  The collection and remittance of a tax under this chapter by a seller
that is registered under the agreement may not be used as a factor in
determining whether that seller is required by Subsection (1)(a) to:
(i)  pay a tax, fee, or charge under:
(A)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act;
(B)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 4, Municipal Telecommunications License Tax
Act;
(C)  Section 19-6-714;
(D)  Section 19-6-805;
(E)  Section 69-2-5;
(F)  Section 69-2-5.5;
(G)  Section 69-2-5.6; or
(H)  this title; or
(ii)  collect and remit a tax, fee, or charge under:
(A)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act;
(B)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 4, Municipal Telecommunications License Tax
Act;
(C)  Section 19-6-714;
(D)  Section 19-6-805;
(E)  Section 69-2-5;
(F)  Section 69-2-5.5;
(G)  Section 69-2-5.6; or
(H)  this title.
(d)  A person shall pay a use tax imposed by this chapter on a transaction
described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) if:
(i)  the seller did not collect a tax imposed by this chapter on the
transaction; and
(ii)  the person:
(A)  stores the tangible personal property or product transferred
electronically in the state;
(B)  uses the tangible personal property or product transferred electronically
in the state; or
(C)  consumes the tangible personal property or product transferred
electronically in the state.
(e)  The ownership of property that is located at the premises of a printer's
facility with which the retailer has contracted for printing and that consists
of the final printed product, property that becomes a part of the final
printed product, or copy from which the printed product is produced, shall not
result in the retailer being considered to have or maintain an office,
distribution house, sales house, warehouse, service enterprise, or other place
of business, or to maintain a stock of goods, within this state.
(f) (i)  As used in this Subsection (1)(f):
(A)  "Affiliated group" is as defined in Section 59-7-101, except that
"affiliated group" includes a corporation that is qualified to do business but
is not otherwise doing business in this state.
(B)  "Common ownership" is as defined in Section 59-7-101.
(C)  "Related seller" means a seller that:
(I)  is not required to pay or collect and remit sales and use taxes under
Subsection (1)(a) or Section 59-12-103.1;
(II)  is:
(Aa)  related to a seller that is required to pay or collect and remit sales
and use taxes under Subsection (1)(a) as part of an affiliated group or
because of common ownership; or
(Bb)  a limited liability company owned by the parent corporation of an
affiliated group if that parent corporation of the affiliated group is
required to pay or collect and remit sales and use taxes under Subsection
(1)(a); and
(III)  does not voluntarily collect and remit a tax under Subsection
(1)(b)(i).
(ii)  A seller is not required to pay or collect and remit sales and use taxes
under Subsection (1)(a):
(A)  if the seller is a related seller;
(B)  if the seller to which the related seller is related does not engage in
any of the following activities on behalf of the related seller:
(I)  advertising;
(II)  marketing;
(III)  sales; or
(IV)  other services; and
(C)  if the seller to which the related seller is related accepts the return
of an item sold by the related seller, the seller to which the related seller
is related accepts the return of that item:
(I)  sold by a seller that is not a related seller; and
(II)  on the same terms as the return of an item sold by that seller to which
the related seller is related.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Section 59-12-107.1, a tax under this chapter
shall be collected from a purchaser.
(b)  A seller may not collect as tax an amount, without regard to fractional
parts of one cent, in excess of the tax computed at the rates prescribed by
this chapter.
(c) (i)  Each seller shall:
(A)  give the purchaser a receipt for the tax collected; or
(B)  bill the tax as a separate item and declare the name of this state and
the seller's sales and use tax license number on the invoice for the sale.
(ii)  The receipt or invoice is prima facie evidence that the seller has
collected the tax and relieves the purchaser of the liability for reporting
the tax to the commission as a consumer.
(d)  A seller is not required to maintain a separate account for the tax
collected, but is considered to be a person charged with receipt, safekeeping,
and transfer of public moneys.
(e)  Taxes collected by a seller pursuant to this chapter shall be held in
trust for the benefit of the state and for payment to the commission in the
manner and at the time provided for in this chapter.
(f)  If any seller, during any reporting period, collects as a tax an amount
in excess of the lawful state and local percentage of total taxable sales
allowed under this chapter, the seller shall remit to the commission the full
amount of the tax imposed under this chapter, plus any excess.
(g)  If the accounting methods regularly employed by the seller in the
transaction of the seller's business are such that reports of sales made
during a calendar month or quarterly period will impose unnecessary hardships,
the commission may accept reports at intervals that will, in the commission's
opinion, better suit the convenience of the taxpayer or seller and will not
jeopardize collection of the tax.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (4) through (6) and Section
59-12-108, the sales or use tax imposed by this chapter is due and payable to
the commission quarterly on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding each calendar quarterly period.
(b) (i)  Each seller shall, on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding each calendar quarterly period, file with the commission a return
for the preceding quarterly period.
(ii)  The seller shall remit with the return under Subsection (3)(b)(i) the
amount of the tax required under this chapter to be collected or paid for the
period covered by the return.
(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), a return shall contain
information and be in a form the commission prescribes by rule.
(d)  The sales tax as computed in the return shall be based upon the total
nonexempt sales made during the period, including both cash and charge sales.
(e)  The use tax as computed in the return shall be based upon the total
amount of purchases for storage, use, or other consumption in this state made
during the period, including both by cash and by charge.
(f) (i)  Subject to Subsection (3)(f)(ii) and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may by rule
extend the time for making returns and paying the taxes.
(ii)  An extension under Subsection (3)(f)(i) may not be for more than 90
days.
(g)  The commission may require returns and payment of the tax to be made for
other than quarterly periods if the commission considers it necessary in order
to ensure the payment of the tax imposed by this chapter.
(h) (i)  The commission may require a seller that files a simplified
electronic return with the commission to file an additional electronic report
with the commission.
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules providing:
(A)  the information required to be included in the additional electronic
report described in Subsection (3)(h)(i); and
(B)  one or more due dates for filing the additional electronic report
described in Subsection (3)(h)(i).
(4) (a)  As used in this Subsection (4) and Subsection (5)(b), "remote seller"
means a seller that is:
(i)  registered under the agreement;
(ii)  described in Subsection (1)(b); and
(iii)  not a:
(A)  model 1 seller;
(B)  model 2 seller; or
(C)  model 3 seller.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b)(ii), a tax a remote seller
collects in accordance with Subsection (1)(b) is due and payable:
(A)  to the commission;
(B)  annually; and
(C)  on or before the last day of the month immediately following the last day
of each calendar year.
(ii)  The commission may require that a tax a remote seller collects in
accordance with Subsection (1)(b) be due and payable:
(A)  to the commission; and
(B)  on the last day of the month immediately following any month in which the
seller accumulates a total of at least $1,000 in agreement sales and use tax.
(c) (i)  If a remote seller remits a tax to the commission in accordance with
Subsection (4)(b), the remote seller shall file a return:
(A)  with the commission;
(B)  with respect to the tax;
(C)  containing information prescribed by the commission; and
(D)  on a form prescribed by the commission.
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules prescribing:
(A)  the information required to be contained in a return described in
Subsection (4)(a)(i); and
(B)  the form described in Subsection (4)(c)(i)(D).
(d)  A tax a remote seller collects in accordance with this Subsection (4)
shall be calculated on the basis of the total amount of taxable transactions
under Subsection 59-12-103(1) the remote seller completes, including:
(i)  a cash transaction; and
(ii)  a charge transaction.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), a tax a seller that files a
simplified electronic return collects in accordance with this chapter is due
and payable:
(i)  monthly on or before the last day of the month immediately following the
month for which the seller collects a tax under this chapter; and
(ii)  for the month for which the seller collects a tax under this chapter.
(b)  A tax a remote seller that files a simplified electronic return collects
in accordance with this chapter is due and payable as provided in Subsection
(4).
(6) (a)  On each vehicle sale made by other than a regular licensed vehicle
dealer, the purchaser shall pay the sales or use tax directly to the
commission if the vehicle is subject to titling or registration under the laws
of this state.
(b)  The commission shall collect the tax described in Subsection (6)(a) when
the vehicle is titled or registered.
(7)  If any sale of tangible personal property or any other taxable
transaction under Subsection 59-12-103(1), is made by a wholesaler to a
retailer, the wholesaler is not responsible for the collection or payment of
the tax imposed on the sale and the retailer is responsible for the collection
or payment of the tax imposed on the sale if:
(a)  the retailer represents that the personal property is purchased by the
retailer for resale; and
(b)  the personal property is not subsequently resold.
(8)  If any sale of property or service subject to the tax is made to a person
prepaying sales or use tax in accordance with Title 63M, Chapter 5, Resource
Development Act, or to a contractor or subcontractor of that person, the
person to whom such payment or consideration is payable is not responsible for
the collection or payment of the sales or use tax and the person prepaying the
sales or use tax is responsible for the collection or payment of the sales or
use tax if the person prepaying the sales or use tax represents that the
amount prepaid as sales or use tax has not been fully credited against sales
or use tax due and payable under the rules promulgated by the commission.
(9) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (9):
(i)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(a)(ii), "bad debt" is as defined in
Section 166, Internal Revenue Code.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (9)(a)(i), "bad debt" does not include:
(A)  an amount included in the purchase price of tangible personal property, a
product transferred electronically, or a service that is:
(I)  not a transaction described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); or
(II)  exempt under Section 59-12-104;
(B)  a financing charge;
(C)  interest;
(D)  a tax imposed under this chapter on the purchase price of tangible
personal property, a product transferred electronically, or a service;
(E)  an uncollectible amount on tangible personal property or a product
transferred electronically that:
(I)  is subject to a tax under this chapter; and
(II)  remains in the possession of a seller until the full purchase price is
paid;
(F)  an expense incurred in attempting to collect any debt; or
(G)  an amount that a seller does not collect on repossessed property.
(b)  A seller may deduct bad debt from the total amount from which a tax under
this chapter is calculated on a return.
(c)  A seller may file a refund claim with the commission if:
(i)  the amount of bad debt for the time period described in Subsection (9)(e)
exceeds the amount of the seller's sales that are subject to a tax under this
chapter for that same time period; and
(ii)  as provided in Section 59-1-1410.
(d)  A bad debt deduction under this section may not include interest.
(e)  A bad debt may be deducted under this Subsection (9) on a return for the
time period during which the bad debt:
(i)  is written off as uncollectible in the seller’s books and records; and
(ii)  would be eligible for a bad debt deduction:
(A)  for federal income tax purposes; and
(B)  if the seller were required to file a federal income tax return.
(f)  If a seller recovers any portion of bad debt for which the seller makes a
deduction or claims a refund under this Subsection (9), the seller shall
report and remit a tax under this chapter:
(i)  on the portion of the bad debt the seller recovers; and
(ii)  on a return filed for the time period for which the portion of the bad
debt is recovered.
(g)  For purposes of reporting a recovery of a portion of bad debt under
Subsection (9)(f), a seller shall apply amounts received on the bad debt in
the following order:
(i)  in a proportional amount:
(A)  to the purchase price of the tangible personal property, product
transferred electronically, or service; and
(B)  to the tax due under this chapter on the tangible personal property,
product transferred electronically, or service; and
(ii)  to:
(A)  interest charges;
(B)  service charges; and
(C)  other charges.
(h)  A seller's certified service provider may make a deduction or claim a
refund for bad debt on behalf of the seller:
(i)  in accordance with this Subsection (9); and
(ii)  if the certified service provider credits or refunds the entire amount
of the bad debt deduction or refund to the seller.
(i)  A seller may allocate bad debt among the states that are members of the
agreement if the seller's books and records support that allocation.
(10) (a)  A seller may not, with intent to evade any tax, fail to timely remit
the full amount of tax required by this chapter.
(b)  A violation of this section is punishable as provided in Section
59-1-401.
(c)  Each person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax
required to be paid to the state, except amounts determined to be due by the
commission under Chapter 1, Part 14, Assessment, Collections, and Refunds Act,
or Section 59-12-111, within the time required by this chapter, or who fails
to file any return as required by this chapter, shall pay, in addition to the
tax, penalties and interest as provided in Section 59-1-401.
(d)  For purposes of prosecution under this section, each quarterly tax period
in which a seller, with intent to evade any tax, collects a tax and fails to
timely remit the full amount of the tax required to be remitted, constitutes a
separate offense.
